Mississippi, session 2026, HB1623.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Mississippi HBCU Maternal Health Workforce Pipeline Act." SECTION 2.  The Legislature finds the following: (a)  Mississippi faces persistent maternal and infant health disparities, particularly in rural and historically underserved communities; (b)  Workforce shortages in obstetrics, nursing, behavioral health, nutrition, and community-based maternal support roles undermine access to timely, culturally responsive care; (c)  Jackson State University, Alcorn State University, and Mississippi Valley State University are critical workforce anchors with longstanding missions of access, equity, and community service; (d)  Paid training, academic supports, and service-linked scholarships are proven strategies for building durable healthcare workforces; and (e)  Coordinated leadership between the Mississippi State Department of Health and the Institutions of Higher Learning is necessary to align education, public health, and care delivery systems. SECTION 3.  As used in this act, the following terms shall have the following meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Department" means the Mississippi State Department of Health (MSDH). (b)  "IHL" means the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. (c)  "Participating HBCUs" means Jackson State University, Alcorn State University, and Mississippi Valley State University. (d)  "Division" means the Division of Medicaid. (e)  "Maternal care setting" means a hospital, birthing center, federally qualified health center, rural health clinic, local health department, community-based maternal health organization, home visiting program, or other approved site. (f)  "Pipeline participant" means a student or trainee enrolled in a pathway under this act. (g)  "Service commitment area" means a county or region designated by MSDH as experiencing a maternal health workforce shortage. (h)  "Program" means the Mississippi HBCU Maternal Health Workforce Pipeline Program. (i)  "HBCUs" means historically black colleges and universities. SECTION 4.  There is hereby created the Mississippi HBCU Maternal Health Workforce Pipeline Program, which is a five-year demonstration and implementation initiative jointly administered by MSDH and IHL. SECTION 5.  (1)  MSDH and IHL shall jointly administer the program. (2)  MSDH shall serve as the public health and clinical integration authority, responsible for the following: (a)  Identifying maternal health workforce priorities; (b)  Coordinating clinical placements; (c)  Aligning program goals with maternal mortality reduction strategies; and (d)  Evaluating health impact. (3)  IHL shall serve as the academic and credentialing authority, responsible for: (a)  Pathway design and degree alignment; (b)  Articulation agreements; (c)  Student academic supports; and (d)  Faculty coordination. (4)  MSDH and IHL shall execute a memorandum of understanding within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act. SECTION 6.  The program shall establish stackable pathways into maternal health occupations, including but not limited to, the following: (a)  Community-based maternal support such as: (i)  Doulas; (ii)  Lactation counselors; (iii)  Community health workers; and (iv)  Home visiting specialists. (b)  Clinical maternal care provided by the following: (i)  Certified nursing assistants (CNAs), licensed practical nurses (LPNs), registered nurses (RNs) and nurses who have a bachelor of science in nursing (BSNs); (ii)  Women's health nurse practitioners; (iii)  Nurse midwives; and (iv)  Obstetrics social workers and counselors. (c)  Nutrition and chronic disease in pregnancy: (i)  Dietetic technicians and registered dietitians; and (ii) Gestational diabetes educators. (d)  Maternal mental health provided by licensed professional counselors, licensed clinical social workers and  psychology trainees with perinatal specialization. SECTION 7.  (1)  The MSDH shall contract with maternal care settings to provide paid placements, apprenticeships, and residencies for pipeline participants. (2) Placements shall include structured training in: (a)  Respectful maternity care; (b)  Care coordination; (c)  Maternal mental health screening; (d)  Nutrition counseling integration; and (e)  Referral protocols. SECTION 8.  (1)  There is created a Maternal Health Scholars Program at each participating HBCU. (2)  Scholars may receive the following: (a)  Tuition and fee assistance; (b)  Stipends; (c)  Books, uniforms, testing, and licensure fees; (d)  Housing and transportation support for rural placements. (3)  Priority shall be given to students committing to serve in a service commitment area. SECTION 9.  (1)  Scholarship recipients shall agree to serve in a Mississippi maternal care setting for not less than two (2) years for each year of support received, not to exceed four (4) years. (2) MSDH may grant hardship waivers. SECTION 10.  (1)  The Division of Medicaid shall collaborate with MSDH to: (a)  Align reimbursement policies to support team-based maternal care; (b)  Permit use of pipeline trainees under appropriate supervision where allowable; and (c)  Integrate community-based maternal support roles. (2)  The Mississippi Department of Employment Security may align workforce dollars where permitted. SECTION 11.  (1)  There is created the HBCU Maternal Health Pipeline Council that shall be co-chaired by the State Health Officer and the Commissioner of Higher Education. (2)  Membership shall include representatives from each participating HBCU, Medicaid, rural hospitals, FQHCs, and community-based maternal organizations. SECTION 12.  (1)  MSDH shall track the following: (a)  Enrollment and completion; (b)  Credential attainment; (c)  Job placement; (d)  Retention at 12 and 24 months; (e)  Geographic distribution; and (m)  Maternal health access indicators. (2)  An annual report shall be submitted to the Legislature by December 1. SECTION 13.  (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Maternal Health Pipeline Fund.  The fund shall consist of legislative appropriations, federal funds, contributions, donations, gifts and monies from any other source that are made available for deposit into the fund. (2)  Monies in the fund shall be administered by the Mississippi Department of Mental Health and the Board of Trustees of  State Institutions of Higher Learning, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to award scholarships under the Maternal Heath Scholars Program at participating Historically Black Colleges and Universities. (3)  Monies remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. SECTION 14.  For fiscal years 2027 through 2031, the sum of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000) annually is hereby authorized, subject to appropriation, for a total of Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000) over five years.  Annual allocations shall be utilized for scholarships and stipends, paid clinical placements, faculty and pathway coordinators, rural housing and travel support, simulation labs and equipment, data and evaluation and program administration. SECTION 15.  The program shall be implemented in the following years of sequence: (a)  During year one the program design and Memorandum of Understandings and first 150 students within the program shall be implemented; (b)  During year two expansion of the program to  300 students, which include rural placements; (c)  During year three implementation of  full statewide coverage and Medicaid alignment; (d)  During year four implementation of scaling and refinement of pathways; and (e)  During year five examination of outcome evaluation and permanency recommendations. SECTION 16.  If any provision of this act is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect the remaining provisions. SECTION 17.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.